Nevada, session 83, AB455.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 361.069 is hereby amended to read as follows:
361.069 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section,
household goods and furniture are exempt from taxation.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, appliances
and furniture which are owned by a person who engages in the
business of renting the appliances or furniture to other persons are
not exempt from taxation.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
assessment of rented or leased appliances or furniture, or both, of a
time-share project governed by the provisions of chapter 119A of
NRS, which contains five or more units, must be reduced by a
percentage equal to the average percentage of time that all of the
units are occupied by an owner of a time share in the project. If the
units of the time-share project are occupied by owners of time
shares in the project for an average of more than 90 percent of the
fiscal year, the rented or leased appliances or furniture, or both, are
exempt from taxation. As used in this subsection:
(a) “Owner” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 119A.056.
(b) “Unit” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 119A.160.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Household goods and furniture” includes, without
limitation, the following items if used in a residence:
(1) Clothing;
(2) Personal effects;
(3) Gold and silver;
(4) Jewelry;
(5) Appliances that are not attached to real property or a
mobile or manufactured home;
(6) Furniture;
-
*AB455*

– 3 –
(7) Recreational equipment not required by NRS to be
registered; [and]
(8) Portable goods and storage sheds and other household
equipment [.] ; and
(9) Flags, flagpoles that are not fixtures or improvements to
real property and any other equipment for displaying a flag that is
not a fixture or improvement to real property.
(b) “Engages in the business of renting appliances or furniture”
means:
(1) Renting or leasing appliances or furniture, or both, to
other persons not in conjunction with the rental or lease of a
dwelling unit; or
(2) Renting or leasing appliances or furniture, or both, to
other persons in conjunction with the rental or lease of a dwelling
unit located in a complex containing five or more dwelling units
which are rented or leased by the owner to other persons in
conjunction with appliances or furniture, or both.
Sec. 2. NRS 361.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
361.090 1. The property, to the extent of $2,000 assessed
valuation, plus the amount of any assessed valuation attributable
to a flagpole that is a fixture or improvement to real property, of
any actual bona fide resident of the State of Nevada who:
(a) Has served a minimum of 90 continuous days on active duty,
who was assigned to active duty at some time between April 21,
1898, and June 15, 1903, or between April 6, 1917, and
November 11, 1918, or between December 7, 1941, and
December 31, 1946, or between June 25, 1950, and May 7, 1975, or
between September 26, 1982, and December 1, 1987, or between
October 23, 1983, and November 21, 1983, or between
December 20, 1989, and January 31, 1990, or between August 2,
1990, and April 11, 1991, or between December 5, 1992, and
March 31, 1994, or between November 20, 1995, and December 20,
1996;
(b) Has served on active duty in connection with carrying out
the authorization granted to the President of the United States in
Public Law 102-1; or
(c) Has served on active duty in connection with a campaign or
expedition for service in which a medal has been authorized by the
Government of the United States, regardless of the number of days
served on active duty,
 and who received, upon severance from service, an honorable
discharge or certificate of satisfactory service from the Armed
Forces of the United States, or who, having so served, is still serving
in the Armed Forces of the United States, is exempt from taxation.
-
*AB455*

– 4 –
2. For the purpose of this section, [the first $2,000 assessed
valuation of] any property in which an applicant has any interest
shall be deemed the property of the applicant.
3. The exemption may be allowed only to a claimant who files
an affidavit with his or her claim for exemption on real property
pursuant to NRS 361.155. The affidavit may be filed at any time by
a person claiming exemption from taxation on personal property.
4. The affidavit must be made before the county assessor or a
notary public and filed with the county assessor. It must state that
the affiant is a bona fide resident of the State of Nevada who meets
all the other requirements of subsection 1 and that the exemption is
not claimed in any other county in this State. After the filing of the
original affidavit, the county assessor shall, except as otherwise
provided in this subsection, mail a form for:
(a) The renewal of the exemption; and
(b) The designation of any amount to be credited to the Gift
Account for the Veterans Home in Southern Nevada or the Gift
Account for the Veterans Home in Northern Nevada established
pursuant to NRS 417.145,
 to the person each year following a year in which the exemption
was allowed for that person. The form must be designed to facilitate
its return by mail by the person claiming the exemption. If so
requested by the person claiming the exemption, the county assessor
may provide the form to the person by electronic means in lieu of by
mail. The county assessor may authorize the return of the form by
electronic means in accordance with the provisions of chapter 719
of NRS.
5. Persons in actual military service are exempt during the
period of such service from filing the annual forms for renewal of
the exemption, and the county assessors shall continue to grant the
exemption to such persons on the basis of the original affidavits
filed. In the case of any person who has entered the military service
without having previously made and filed an affidavit of exemption,
the affidavit may be filed in his or her behalf during the period of
such service by any person having knowledge of the facts.
6. Before allowing any veteran’s exemption pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter, the county assessor shall require proof of
status of the veteran, and for that purpose shall require production of
an honorable discharge or certificate of satisfactory service or a
certified copy thereof, or such other proof of status as may be
necessary.
7. If any person files a false affidavit or produces false proof to
the county assessor or a notary public and, as a result of the false
affidavit or false proof, the person is allowed a tax exemption to
-
*AB455*

– 5 –
which the person is not entitled, the person is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.
8. Beginning with the 2005-2006 Fiscal Year, the monetary
amounts in [subsections] subsection 1 [and 2] must be adjusted for
each fiscal year by adding to the amount the product of the amount
multiplied by the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index
(All Items) from July 2003 to the July preceding the fiscal year for
which the adjustment is calculated. The Department shall provide to
each county assessor the adjusted amount, in writing, on or before
September 30 of each year.
Sec. 3. NRS 361.091 is hereby amended to read as follows:
361.091 1. A bona fide resident of the State of Nevada who
has incurred a permanent service-connected disability and has been
honorably discharged from the Armed Forces of the United States,
or his or her surviving spouse, is entitled to an exemption.
2. The amount of exemption is based on the total percentage of
permanent service-connected disability. The maximum allowable
exemption for total permanent disability is the first $20,000 assessed
valuation [.] , plus the amount of any assessed valuation
attributable to a flagpole that is a fixture or improvement to real
property. A person with a permanent service-connected disability
of:
(a) Eighty to 99 percent, inclusive, is entitled to an exemption of
$15,000 assessed value [.] , plus the amount of any assessed
valuation attributable to a flagpole that is a fixture or
improvement to real property.
(b) Sixty to 79 percent, inclusive, is entitled to an exemption of
$10,000 assessed value [.] , plus the amount of any assessed
valuation attributable to a flagpole that is a fixture or
improvement to real property.
 For the purposes of this section, any property in which an
applicant has any interest is deemed to be the property of the
applicant.
3. The exemption may be allowed only to a claimant who has
filed an affidavit with his or her claim for exemption on real
property pursuant to NRS 361.155. The affidavit may be made at
any time by a person claiming an exemption from taxation on
personal property.
4. The affidavit must be made before the county assessor or a
notary public and be filed with the county assessor. It must state that
the affiant is a bona fide resident of the State of Nevada, that the
affiant meets all the other requirements of subsection 1 and that the
exemption is not claimed in any other county within this State. After
the filing of the original affidavit, the county assessor shall, except
as otherwise provided in this subsection, mail a form for:
-
*AB455*

– 6 –
(a) The renewal of the exemption; and
(b) The designation of any amount to be credited to the Gift
Account for the Veterans Home in Southern Nevada or the Gift
Account for the Veterans Home in Northern Nevada established
pursuant to NRS 417.145,
 to the person each year following a year in which the exemption
was allowed for that person. The form must be designed to facilitate
its return by mail by the person claiming the exemption. If so
requested by the person claiming the exemption, the county assessor
may provide the form to the person by electronic means in lieu of by
mail. The county assessor may authorize the return of the form by
electronic means in accordance with the provisions of chapter 719
of NRS.
5. Before allowing any exemption pursuant to the provisions of
this section, the county assessor shall require proof of the
applicant’s status, and for that purpose shall require the applicant to
produce an original or certified copy of:
(a) An honorable discharge or other document of honorable
separation from the Armed Forces of the United States which
indicates the total percentage of his or her permanent service-
connected disability;
(b) A certificate of satisfactory service which indicates the total
percentage of his or her permanent service-connected disability; or
(c) A certificate from the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs or any other military document which shows that he or she
has incurred a permanent service-connected disability and which
indicates the total percentage of that disability, together with a
certificate of honorable discharge or satisfactory service.
6. A surviving spouse claiming an exemption pursuant to this
section must file with the county assessor an affidavit declaring that:
(a) The surviving spouse was married to and living with the
veteran who incurred a permanent service-connected disability for
the 5 years preceding his or her death;
(b) The veteran was eligible for the exemption at the time of his
or her death or would have been eligible if the veteran had been a
resident of the State of Nevada;
(c) The surviving spouse has not remarried; and
(d) The surviving spouse is a bona fide resident of the State of
Nevada.
 The affidavit required by this subsection is in addition to the
certification required pursuant to subsections 4 and 5. After the
filing of the original affidavit required by this subsection, the county
assessor shall, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, mail
a form for renewal of the exemption to the person each year
following a year in which the exemption was allowed for that
-
*AB455*

– 7 –
person. The form must be designed to facilitate its return by mail by
the person claiming the exemption. If so requested by the person
claiming the exemption, the county assessor may provide the form
to the person by electronic means in lieu of by mail. The county
assessor may authorize the return of the form by electronic means in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 719 of NRS.
7. If a veteran or the surviving spouse of a veteran submits, as
proof of disability, documentation that indicates a percentage of
permanent service-connected disability for more than one permanent
service-connected disability, the amount of the exemption must be
based on the total of those combined percentages, not to exceed 100
percent.
8. If a tax exemption is allowed under this section to a person
who qualifies for the exemption:
(a) As a veteran with a permanent service-connected disability,
that person is not entitled to an exemption under NRS 361.090.
(b) Solely as the surviving spouse of a veteran with a permanent
service-connected disability, the allowance of a tax exemption under
this section does not affect the eligibility of that person for an
exemption under NRS 361.090.
9. If any person files a false affidavit or produces false proof to
the county assessor or a notary public and, as a result of the false
affidavit or false proof, the person is allowed a tax exemption to
which the person is not entitled, the person is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.
10. Beginning with the 2005-2006 Fiscal Year, the monetary
amounts in subsection 2 must be adjusted for each fiscal year by
adding to the amount the product of the amount multiplied by the
percentage increase in the consumer price inflation index from July
2003 to the July preceding the fiscal year for which the adjustment
is calculated. The Department shall provide to each county assessor
the adjusted amount, in writing, on or before September 30 of each
year.
11. For the purposes of this section, “consumer price inflation
index” means the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers,
West Region (All Items), as published by the United States
Department of Labor or, if that index ceases to be published by the
United States Department of Labor, the published index that most
closely resembles that index, as determined by the Department.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB455*